California, session 20252026, SB1085.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10910 of the Water Code is amended to read:10910. (a) Any city or county shall comply with this part when either of the following occurs:(1) An applicant submits to the city or county a preliminary application pursuant to Section 65941.1 of the Government Code for a project, as defined in Section 10912, that meets the conditions set forth in Section 21080.66 of the Public Resources Code.(2) For a project, as defined in Section 10912, that does not meet the conditions of paragraph (1), the city or county determines a development application is complete or a development application is deemed complete pursuant to Section 65943 of the Government Code.(b) The city or county, upon receipt of an application that meets the criteria of subdivision (a), shall identify any water system whose service area includes the project site and any water system adjacent to the project site that is, or may become as a result of supplying water to the project identified pursuant to this subdivision, a public water system, as defined in Section 10912, that may supply water for the project. If the city or county is not able to identify any public water system that may supply water for the project, the city or county shall prepare the water assessment required by this part after consulting with any entity serving domestic water supplies whose service area includes the project site, the local agency formation commission, and any public water system adjacent to the project site.(c) (1) The city or county, within 15 days of receipt of an application that meets the criteria of subdivision (a), shall request each public water system identified pursuant to subdivision (b) to determine whether the projected water demand associated with a proposed project was included as part of the most recently adopted urban water management plan adopted pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610).(2) If the projected water demand associated with the proposed project was accounted for in the most recently adopted urban water management plan, the public water system may incorporate the requested information from the urban water management plan in preparing the elements of the assessment required to comply with subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g).(3) If the projected water demand associated with the proposed project was not accounted for in the most recently adopted urban water management plan, or the public water system has no urban water management plan, the water supply assessment for the project shall include a discussion with regard to whether the public water system’s total projected water supplies available during normal, single dry, and multiple dry water years during a 20-year projection will meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project, in addition to the public water system’s existing and planned future uses, including agricultural and manufacturing uses.(4) If the city or county is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), the water supply assessment for the project shall include a discussion with regard to whether the total projected water supplies, determined to be available by the city or county for the project during normal, single dry, and multiple dry water years during a 20-year projection, will meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project, in addition to existing and planned future uses, including agricultural and manufacturing uses.(d) (1) The assessment required by this section shall include an identification of any existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts relevant to the identified water supply for the proposed project, and a description of the quantities of water received in prior years by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), under the existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts.(2) An identification of existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts held by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), shall be demonstrated by providing information related to all of the following:(A) Written contracts or other proof of entitlement to an identified water supply.(B) Copies of a capital outlay program for financing the delivery of a water supply that has been adopted by the public water system.(C) Federal, state, and local permits for construction of necessary infrastructure associated with delivering the water supply.(D) Any necessary regulatory approvals that are required in order to be able to convey or deliver the water supply.(e) If no water has been received in prior years by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), under the existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts, the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), shall also include in its water supply assessment pursuant to subdivision (c), an identification of the other public water systems or water service contractholders that receive a water supply or have existing water supply entitlements, water rights, or water service contracts, to the same source of water as the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), has identified as a source of water supply within its water supply assessments.(f) If a water supply for a proposed project includes groundwater, the following additional information shall be included in the water supply assessment:(1) A review of any information contained in the urban water management plan relevant to the identified water supply for the proposed project.(2) (A) A description of any groundwater basin or basins from which the proposed project will be supplied.(B) For those basins for which a court or the board has adjudicated the rights to pump groundwater, a copy of the order or decree adopted by the court or the board and a description of the amount of groundwater the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), has the legal right to pump under the order or decree.(C) For a basin that has not been adjudicated that is a basin designated as high- or medium-priority pursuant to Section 10722.4, information regarding the following:(i) Whether the department has identified the basin as being subject to critical conditions of overdraft pursuant to Section 12924.(ii) If a groundwater sustainability agency has adopted a groundwater sustainability plan or has an approved alternative, a copy of that alternative or plan.(D) For a basin that has not been adjudicated that is a basin designated as low- or very low priority pursuant to Section 10722.4, information as to whether the department has identified the basin or basins as overdrafted or has projected that the basin will become overdrafted if present management conditions continue, in the most current bulletin of the department that characterizes the condition of the groundwater basin, and a detailed description by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), of the efforts being undertaken in the basin or basins to eliminate the long-term overdraft condition.(3) A detailed description and analysis of the amount and location of groundwater pumped by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), for the past five years from any groundwater basin from which the proposed project will be supplied. The description and analysis shall be based on information that is reasonably available, including, but not limited to, historic use records.(4) A detailed description and analysis of the amount and location of groundwater that is projected to be pumped by the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), from any basin from which the proposed project will be supplied. The description and analysis shall be based on information that is reasonably available, including, but not limited to, historic use records.(5) An analysis of the sufficiency of the groundwater from the basin or basins from which the proposed project will be supplied to meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project. A water supply assessment shall not be required to include the information required by this paragraph if the public water system determines, as part of the review required by paragraph (1), that the sufficiency of groundwater necessary to meet the initial and projected water demand associated with the project was addressed in the description and analysis required by subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 10631.(g) (1) (A) For a project that does not meet the requirements of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), the governing body of each public water system shall submit the assessment to the city or county not later than 90 days from the date on which the request was received. The governing body of each public water system, or the governing body of the city or county water system if the city or county is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), shall approve the assessment prepared pursuant to this section at a regular or special meeting.(B) Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period, if the public water system intends to request an extension of time to prepare and adopt the assessment, the public water system shall meet with the city or county to request an extension of time, which shall not exceed 30 days, to prepare and adopt the assessment.(C) If the public water system fails to request an extension of time, or fails to submit the assessment notwithstanding the extension of time granted pursuant to subparagraph (B), the city or county may seek a writ of mandamus to compel the governing body of the public water system to comply with the requirements of this part relating to the submission of the water supply assessment.(2) (A) For a project described in subparagraph (D), the public water system shall submit the assessment to the city or county no later than 45 days from the date that the request was received.(B) The governing body of each public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), shall not be required to approve the assessment at a public meeting.(C) If the public water system fails to submit the assessment, the city or county may seek a writ of mandamus to compel the public water system to comply with the requirements of this part relating to the submission of the water supply assessment.(D) This paragraph applies only to a project that meets either of the following conditions:(i) The project meets the conditions in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(ii) The project is proposed to be permitted pursuant to Section 65913.4 of the Government Code or Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 65912.100) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if a project has been the subject of a water supply assessment that complies with the requirements of this part, no additional water supply assessment shall be required for subsequent projects that were part of a larger project for which a water supply assessment was completed and that has complied with the requirements of this part and for which the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), has concluded that its water supplies are sufficient to meet the projected water demand associated with the proposed project, in addition to the existing and planned future uses, including, but not limited to, agricultural and industrial uses, unless one or more of the following changes occurs:(1) Changes in the project that result in a substantial increase in water demand for the project.(2) Changes in the circumstances or conditions substantially affecting the ability of the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), to provide a sufficient supply of water for the project.(3) Significant new information becomes available that was not known and could not have been known at the time when the assessment was prepared.(i) For the purposes of this section, hauled water is not considered as a source of water.SEC. 2. Section 10911 of the Water Code is amended to read:10911. (a) If, as a result of its assessment, the public water system concludes that its water supplies are, or will be, insufficient, the public water system shall provide to the city or county its plans for acquiring additional water supplies, setting forth the measures that are being undertaken to acquire and develop those water supplies. If the city or county, if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), (b) of Section 10910, concludes as a result of its assessment, that water supplies are, or will be, insufficient, the city or county shall include in its water supply assessment its plans for acquiring additional water supplies, setting forth the measures that are being undertaken to acquire and develop those water supplies. Those plans may include, but are not limited to, information concerning all of the following:(1) The estimated total costs, and the proposed method of financing the costs, associated with acquiring the additional water supplies.(2) All federal, state, and local permits, approvals, or entitlements that are anticipated to be required in order to acquire and develop the additional water supplies.(3) Based on the considerations set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2), the estimated timeframes within which the public water system, or the city or county if either is required to comply with this part pursuant to subdivision (b), (b) of Section 10910, expects to be able to acquire additional water supplies.(b) The city or county shall include the water supply assessment provided pursuant to Section 10910, and any information provided pursuant to subdivision (a), in any environmental document prepared for the project pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(c) The city or county may include in any environmental document an evaluation of any information included in that environmental document provided pursuant to subdivision (b). The city or county shall determine, based on the entire record, whether projected water supplies will be sufficient to satisfy the demands of the project, in addition to existing and planned future uses. If the city or county determines that water supplies will not be sufficient, the city or county shall include that determination in its findings for the project.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 10914 of the Water Code is amended to read:10914. (a) Nothing in this part is intended to create a right or entitlement to water service or any specific level of water service.(b) Nothing in this part is intended to either impose, expand, or limit any duty concerning the obligation of a public water system to provide certain service to its existing customers or to any future potential customers.(c) Nothing in this part is intended to modify or otherwise change existing law with respect to projects that are not subject to this part.(d) A water supply assessment prepared pursuant to this part is an informational document and not a final agency action. action subject to judicial review except as part of either of the following:(1) A challenge to a city or county’s certification of an environmental impact report, or adoption of a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration, for a housing development project.(2) A challenge to a city or county’s approval or disapproval of a project, as defined in Section 10912, that is not a housing development project.(e) Nothing in this part shall be construed to do either of the following:(1) Subject a project to discretionary review by a city or county if the project is required to be permitted ministerially pursuant to state law, including, but not limited to, Section 65913.4 of, and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 65912.100) of Division 1 of Title 7 of, the Government Code.(2) Subject a project to the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) if the project is otherwise exempt pursuant to any other law.(f) For purposes of this section, “housing development project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.